Utah statutes.
22-6-1.   Retirement trusts exempted from rules against perpetuities, accumulations or suspension of power of alienation.

No trust heretofore or hereafter created by an employer as part of a pension, stock bonus, disability, death benefit, profit sharing, retirement or similar plan, primarily for the benefit of some or all of such employers' employees, their families, appointees or beneficiaries, to which contributions are made by such employer or employees, or by both employer and employees, which trust is for the purpose of distributing to such employees or their families, beneficiaries, or appointees, the earnings or principal, or both, shall be deemed to be invalid by reason of any rule against perpetuities, or against accumulations, or concerning the suspension of the power of alienation of title to property, or any other law restricting or limiting the duration of trusts; and such a trust may continue in perpetuity or for such time as may be necessary to accomplish the purposes for which it was created.

